Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8017.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-13.11 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-13.11. Qualifying low-income housing — Assessment and taxation.
(a) Any residential property that has been issued an occupancy permit on or after January
1, 1995, after substantial rehabilitation as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development and is encumbered by a covenant recorded in the land records in favor of a
governmental unit or Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation restricting either or
both the rents that may be charged to tenants of the property or the incomes of the occupants of the
property, is subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of the property’s previous years’ gross
scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined by each municipality.
(1) At least forty percent (40%) of the rental dwelling units in the property to levels
affordable to households at or below eighty percent (80%) statewide area median income, adjusted
for family size, as established by § 45-53-3, are subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of
the property’s previous year's gross scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined
by each municipality; or
(2) At least thirty percent (30%) of the rental dwelling units in the property to levels
affordable to households at or below sixty percent (60%) statewide area median income, adjusted
for family size, as established by § 45-53-3, are subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of
the property’s previous year's gross scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined

by each municipality.
(b) For those properties that have been approved by the tax assessor for tax treatment under
this section as of July 1, 2026, the manner in which the tax assessor has previously applied this
section shall not be further extended.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004889
========
LC004889 - Page 2 of 3